Hawaii statutes.
§142-14 Sale of diseased animals; penalty.
Any person who sells or offers for sale, or uses, or exposes, or who causes or
procures to be sold, or offered for sale, or used, or to be exposed, any horse
or any other animal having the disease known as glanders, or farcy, or any
other contagious or infectious disease, known by the person to be dangerous to
human life, or which are diseased past recovery, shall be guilty of a petty
misdemeanor. [L 1884, c 51, §6; RL 1925, §619; RL 1935, §214; RL 1945, §1064; RL
1955, §20-15; HRS §142-14; am L 1980, c 232, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next